en: Smoked duck breasts, Smoked duck breast fillet
fr: Magrets de canard fumés, Magret de canard fumé

en: Duck breasts cooked in pan, Duck magret cooked in pan
fr: Magrets de canard grillés, Magret de canard grillé, Magret de canard poêlé

en: Frozen duck breasts, Frozen duck magret
fr: Magrets de canard surgelés

en: Duck meat and skin
fr: Viande de canard avec peau

en: Roasted duck with meat and skin, Baked duck with meat and skin
fr: Canard rôti avec viande et peau, Canard cuit au four avec viande et peau

en: Roasted duck meat, Baked duck meat
fr: Viande de canard rôtie, Viande de canard cuite au four

en: Duck fillets
fr: Filets de canard
hr: Pačji fileti
it: Filetti di anatra

en: Duck neck
fr: Cou de canard

en: Frozen duck neck
fr: Cou de canard surgelé

en: Duck wings
fr: Ailes de canard

en: Frozen duck wings
fr: Ailes de canard surgelées

en: Duck feet
fr: Pattes de canards

en: Frozen duck feet
fr: Pattes de canards surgelées

en: Duck sausages
es: Salchichas de pato
fi: Ankkamakkarat
fr: Saucisses de canard
hr: Pačje kobasice
ja: 鴨肉のソーセージ
nl: Eendenworst

en: Turkey and its products
ca: Gall d'indi i derivats
es: Pavo y sus productos
fr: Dinde et dérivés
hr: Puretina i njeni proizvodi
nl: Kalkoen en afgeleide producten

en: Turkeys, Turkey, Turkey fresh meat, Fresh Turkey, turkey meat
bg: Пуешко месо
ca: Gall d'indi
da: Kalkun, kalkunkød
de: Putenfleisch
es: Pavo
fi: kalkkunat
fr: Dindes, dinde, Viande de dinde
hr: Purice
hu: Pulykák
it: Tacchini, Tacchino
ja: 七面鳥
nl: Kalkoenvlezen
ru: Индейка
zh: 火鸡, 鲜火鸡肉, 鲜火鸡

en: Turkey meat for osso buco, osso buco turkey Meat
fr: Viande de dinde pour osso buco

en: Turkey skewers
fr: Brochettes de dinde

en: Frozen turkey skewers
fr: Brochettes de dinde surgelées

en: Frozen turkey meat
fr: Viande de dinde surgelée